Utah statutes.
9-7-311.   Wrongful withdrawal of books -- Penalty.

If any person not authorized by Section 9-7-303 takes a book from the State Law Library, either with or without the consent of the state law librarian, or violates any of the provisions of this part, that person shall be fined the full cost of replacing the book, plus $50 for each book so taken.



Amended by Chapter 176, 1998 General Session

